Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1335
Discharging any
firearm or weapon from any public highway, road, or bridge; penalty; exception.

A person commits a Class III misdemeanor if such person discharges
any firearm or weapon using any form of compressed gas as a propellant from
any public highway, road, or bridge in this state, unless otherwise allowed
by statute. Upon conviction,
the mandatory minimum fine shall be one hundred dollars.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 319;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 1.